Missouri, session 2026, SB977.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 1, 506, and 508, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto three new sections, to be known as sections
1.037, 506.602, and 508.074, to read as follows:
1.037. 1. The World Health Organization, the United
Nations, the World Economic Forum, and any other
international organization or body shall have no
jurisdiction or power within the state of Missouri. No
rule, regulation, fee, tax, policy, or mandate of any kind
of the World Health Organization, the United Nations, the
World Economic Forum, or any other international
organization or body shall be enforced or implemented by the
state of Missouri or any agency, department, board, or
commission of the state or any municipality or other
political subdivision of the state.
2. The term "international organization or body" as
used in this section shall not include the Hague Conference
on Private International Law (HCCH). Nothing in this
section shall prohibit the child support program of the

SS SCS SBs 977 & 1011 2
family support division within the department of social
services from enforcing or implementing any provision of any
convention, protocol, or instrument issued by the Hague
Conference on Private International Law (HCCH).
506.602. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "No Foreign Laws Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Foreign law", any law, legal framework, legal
code, or system, including religious law when invoked as a
substitute for a state or federal law, derived from a
jurisdiction outside of any state or territory of the United
States, including international organizations and tribunals;
(2) "Fundamental rights", rights guaranteed by the
Constitution of Missouri and the Constitution of the United
States, including, but not limited to, due process, equal
protection, freedom of religion, freedom of speech, and
rights related to marriage, child custody, and property.
3. The application of any foreign law that denies the
parties fundamental rights shall be prohibited and render
the following void and unenforceable:
(1) A ruling or decision of any state court,
arbitration panel, or administrative agency;
(2) A contract or contractual provision, if severable,
that provides for the choice of any foreign law; and
(3) A contract or contractual provision, if severable,
that grants jurisdiction to a foreign tribunal.
4. No court shall enforce or apply:
(1) A judgment, decree, or arbitration decision if it
relies, in whole or in part, on any foreign law that
violates the fundamental rights of a party;
(2) A contract or contractual provision, if severable,
that provides for the choice of any foreign law where the

SS SCS SBs 977 & 1011 3
enforcement or application would be in violation of a
party's fundamental rights; or
(3) Foreign law in matters involving marriage,
divorce, child custody, adoption, or inheritance if such
enforcement or application would be inconsistent with
fundamental rights or public policy.
5. The provisions of this section shall not be
construed to:
(1) Disapprove or abrogate existing precedent of the
Missouri supreme court;
(2) Limit adjudication of ecclesiastical matters of a
religious organization, including the selection,
appointment, discipline, or removal of clergy or
interpretation of doctrine;
(3) Apply to corporations, partnerships, or
associations that voluntarily subject themselves to any
foreign law or foreign courts; or
(4) Apply where federal law preempts state law,
including obligations under treaties or international
agreements.
508.074. No state court, arbitration panel, tribunal,
or administrative agency shall transfer any civil action if
such transfer would result in the application of any other
foreign law, as the term "foreign law" is defined in section
506.602, that would violate or likely violate fundamental
rights, as the term "fundamental rights" is defined in
section 506.602.
✓